California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 an individual, their parent, their legal guardian or conservator, or their authorized representative to provide requested information regarding the race, ethnicity, or preferred language of any of those persons.

(5) The data requirements described in this subdivision shall be integrated with the Life Outcomes Improvement System (LOIS), as established pursuant to Section 4519.1.

(c) (1) No later than June 30, 2025, the department shall establish standardized processes, including standardized templates, for assessing a consumer’s need for respite services. Regional centers shall implement these standardized processes no later than
 January 1, 2026.

(2) The processes shall include a requirement that the regional center obtain information about respite needs from family members and, when appropriate, from other caregivers. The information obtained from these standardized processes shall be considered by the individual’s individual program planning team.

(3) Regional centers shall make any modifications to their purchase-of-service policies as necessary for implementation of this subdivision.

(d) No later than June 30, 2024, the department shall establish a standardized individual program plan template and standardized procedures, including frequency of meetings, that are consistent with person-centered services planning requirements. The template shall be integrated with
 LOIS.
 Regional centers shall implement the standardized individual program plan template and procedures no later than January 1, 2025.

(e) (1) No later than June 30, 2025, the department shall establish standardized vendorization procedures. These procedures may include, but are not limited to, standardized vendorization forms and requirements to streamline vendorization elements, including when services are provided through more than one regional center. Regional centers shall implement these standardized vendorization procedures and provide updated vendor lists to the department on a quarterly basis no later than January 1, 2026.

(2) No later than March 1,
 2028, in consultation with stakeholders, the department shall issue guidance to regional centers on maintaining necessary quality assurance oversight of service providers, special incident reporting, provider directory structure, and rate controls while removing barriers to statewide accessibility of services, including ending the practice and process currently known as courtesy vendorization. Service providers shall give preference to providing services to individuals served by the service provider’s initially vendorizing regional center. This section does not require a regional center to refer individuals to any specific service provider 

(f) (1) No later than January 1, 2025, the department shall establish a standardized intake process consistent with the requirements and timelines specified in Section 4642.

(2) No later than June 30, 2025, and to the extent allowed by current data systems, regional centers shall report to the department, quarterly as described in paragraph (4), the number of assessments and the length of time that it took to determine eligibility.

(3) The department shall include all of the following information in LOIS:

(A) The number of individuals for whom intake was requested.

(B) The outcome of that intake, including whether an assessment was determined to be necessary.

(C) The length of time that it took to complete the assessment.

(D) The number of notices of action sent pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 4642.

(4) Regional centers shall report the data described in this subdivision to the department on a quarterly basis, based on the criteria specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 4519.5.

(g) The department shall develop the standardized processes specified in this section with input from stakeholders, including consumers and families, who reflect the demographic diversity of California, to the extent practicable. In developing the standardized processes specified in this section, the department shall address barriers that may impact access to services.

(h) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section through written directives until regulations are effective.

(i) As part of its quarterly updates to the Legislature pursuant to Section 4474.17, the department shall provide information on the status of implementation of this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 12.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4435.2.

(a) No later than July 1, 2025, the department, with input from stakeholders, including consumers and families, relevant state agencies, and other entities overseeing benefits or services considered generic services by regional centers, including representatives of the State Department of Education, the Department of Rehabilitation, the State Department of Social Services, and the State Department of Health Care Services, shall provide all of the following information to the Legislature in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code:

(1) A definition of generic services.

(2) Options to improve coordination of generic services for individuals and families.

(3) A description of regional center efforts to coordinate generic services for individuals and families.

(4) Identified barriers to accessing generic services.

(b) The department shall explore the feasibility of including the functionality in the Life Outcomes Improvement System (LOIS), as established pursuant to Section 4519.1, to track utilization of generic services. This functionality shall be used to the extent that data are available.

(c) (1) The department shall, with input from stakeholders, including
 consumers and families, evaluate the availability of common services and supports that individuals served by regional centers can access when determined necessary by their individual program planning team or their individualized family service plan team.

(2) The department shall evaluate these common services and supports for all of the following:

(A) Inconsistencies in the availability of services or supports across the state.

(B) Availability of services or supports based on the preferred language of consumers.

(C) Recommendations for addressing inconsistencies, including data collection and related infrastructure requirements that may be necessary to analyze service or support use patterns.

(3) By January 10, 2025, the department shall provide a status update on efforts to complete the evaluation described in this subdivision and a projected date for completing the evaluation.

(d) As part of its quarterly updates to the Legislature pursuant to Section 4474.17, the department shall provide information on the status of implementation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 13.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4436.

(a) In order to provide the information necessary to assess the impact of implementing the recommendations of the report submitted by the California Health and Human Services Agency, pursuant to Section 14 of Chapter 25 of the Statutes of 2013, the State Department of Developmental Services shall evaluate enhanced behavioral supports homes, established pursuant to Article 3.6 (commencing with Section 4684.80) of Chapter 6 of Division 4.5, community crisis homes, established pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 4698) of Chapter 6 of Division 4.5, and the acute crisis centers at the Fairview Developmental Center and the Sonoma Developmental Center, as described in subdivision (h) of Section 4418.7.

(b) The evaluation for enhanced behavioral supports homes and community crisis homes shall include information, by regional center catchment area, regarding the number of homes approved, the number of homes opened, the number of beds, the number of placements in a home from outside the regional center catchment area, comparative summary information regarding the characteristics of the persons served in these homes, immediate past residential settings, vacancy rates, and the established fixed facility rates and individual rates.

(c) The evaluation for community crisis homes and the acute crisis centers at the Fairview Developmental Center and the Sonoma Developmental Center shall include comparative information regarding characteristics of the persons served, immediate past residential settings, staffing requirements, the average monthly occupancy, the average length of time to secure placement into the home or center, the average
 length of stay, the regional center of origin for placements, the number of placements from outside the regional center of origin, the number of individuals with multiple stays, the number of residents whose discharge was delayed due to the unavailability of a residential placement, and the per capita and total cost for each home or center.

(d) The evaluation for enhanced behavioral supports homes shall also include the number of beds in the homes utilizing delayed egress devices in combination with secured perimeters, the extent to which the statewide limit established in regulation on the total number of beds permitted in homes with delayed egress devices in combination with secured perimeters is exceeded, the number of residents requiring out-of-home crisis intervention services, the nature of the services provided, and the ability of residents to return to the same home after temporary placement in another facility.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide the evaluations of enhanced behavioral supports homes and community crisis homes to the budget committees and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature annually, commencing on January 10 of the year after the first enhanced behavioral supports home or community crisis home is opened and services have commenced.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide the evaluations for the acute crisis centers at the following facilities to the budget committees and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature annually:

(A) The Fairview Developmental Center, commencing on January 10, 2015.

(B) The
 Sonoma Developmental Center, commencing on January 10, 2016.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 30, Sec. 10.   (SB 856)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4436.5.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Physical restraint” means any behavioral or mechanical restraint as defined in Section 1180.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Chemical restraint” means a drug that is used to control behavior and that is used in a manner not required to treat the patient’s medical conditions.

(3) “Long-term health care facility” means a facility, as defined in Section 1418 of the Health and Safety Code, that is required to report to a regional center pursuant to Section 54327 of
 Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(4) “Acute psychiatric hospital” means a facility, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, including an institution for mental disease, that is a regional center vendor.

(5) “Regional center vendor” means an agency, individual, or service provider that a regional center has approved to provide vendored or contracted services or supports pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648.

(b) The department shall ensure the consistent, timely, and public reporting of data it receives from regional centers pursuant to Section 54327 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations regarding the use of physical restraint, chemical
 restraint, or both, by all regional center vendors who provide residential services or supported living services pursuant to Section 4689, and by long-term health care facilities and acute psychiatric hospitals serving individuals with developmental disabilities.

(c) The department shall publish quarterly on its Internet Web site the following data, segregated by individual regional center vendor that provides residential services or supported living services and each individual long-term health care facility and acute psychiatric hospital that serves persons with developmental disabilities:

(1) The number of incidents of physical restraint.

(2) The number of incidents of chemical
 restraint.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   (AB 918)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4437.

(a) The State Department of Developmental Services shall, on or before February 1 of each year, report to the Legislature and post on its internet website supplemental budget information, which shall include both of the following:

(1) An estimate for the annual budget, including a breakdown of the staffing costs for Porterville
 Developmental
 Center.

(2) For each regional center, all of the following information:

(A) Current fiscal year allocations of total and per capita funding for operations and purchase of services.

(B) The number of persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities being served by the regional center in the current fiscal year.

(C) The past fiscal year and current fiscal year information on the funding for its community placement
 plan pursuant to former Section 4418.25, as that section read on June 30, 2026, or its community resource development plan pursuant to Section 4418.25, including a breakdown of the funding for startup, assessment, placement, and deflection.

(D) Staff information.

(b) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 253, Sec. 3.   (AB 175)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. ADMINISTRATION OF STATE INSTITUTIONS FOR THE DEVELOPMENTALLY DISABLED [4440. - 4499.]



  CHAPTER 1. Jurisdiction and General Government [4440. - 4474.8.]

4440.

The department has jurisdiction over the following institutions:

Fairview State Hospital.

Frank D. Lanterman State Hospital.

Porterville State Hospital.

Sonoma State Hospital.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 82.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4440.1.

The department may contract with the State Department of State Hospitals to provide services to persons with developmental disabilities in state hospitals under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 122.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4440.5.

A state hospital under the jurisdiction of the department may also be known as a developmental center.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 582, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4441.

Except as otherwise specifically provided elsewhere in this code, all of the institutions under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Developmental Services shall be governed by uniform rule and regulation of the State Department of Developmental Services and all of the provisions of this chapter shall apply to the conduct and management of such institutions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4441.5.

The State Department of Developmental Services shall develop policies and procedures, by no later than 30 days following the effective date of the Budget Act of 1999, at each developmental center, to notify appropriate law enforcement agencies in the event of a forensic client walkaway or escape. Local law enforcement agencies, including local police and county sheriff’s departments, shall review the policies and procedures prior to final implementation by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 146, Sec. 24.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4442.

Each state hospital is a corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4443.

Each such corporation may acquire and hold in its corporate name by gift, grant, devise, or bequest property to be applied to the maintenance of the patients of the hospital and for the general use of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4444.

All lands necessary for the use of state hospitals except those acquired by gift, devise, or purchase, shall be acquired by condemnation as lands for other public uses are acquired.

The terms of every purchase shall be approved by the State Department of Developmental Services. No public street or road for railway or other purposes, except for hospital use, shall be opened through the lands of any state hospital, unless the Legislature by special enactment consents thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4445.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 4444, the Director of General Services, with the consent of the State Department of Developmental Services, may grant rights-of-way for road purposes over and across state property comprising the site of the Sonoma State Hospital, upon such terms and conditions as the Director of General Services may deem to be for the best interests of the state.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4105 by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4446.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4444, the Director of General Services may enter into an agreement with the City of Santa Clara for the dedication of a public right-of-way and the granting of long-term easements, as specified in subdivision (d), by the department over and across state property within Agnews State Hospital, for public road purposes.

(b) The term of any easement agreed to by the department shall be of sufficient duration to enable the city to exercise jurisdiction over the public street or road thereon for maintenance purposes. Any construction or maintenance of a public street or road shall be at no cost to the state, and shall be subject to any applicable state or local requirements relating to accessibility for the physically handicapped or disabled.

(c) The agreement shall contain such terms, conditions, reservations, and exceptions as the director deems in the best interest of the state, and as will protect the future use and marketability of the property.

(d) Any public right-of-way or easements agreed to pursuant to subdivision (a) shall meet the following specifications:

(1) A public right-of-way over approximately an 80-foot wide strip of land starting at a point approximately 1450 feet east of the center line of De La Cruz Boulevard and running in a northerly direction from Montague Expressway approximately 2200 feet to a point 250 feet south of the northern boundary of the Camsi III property, the last 970 feet of which lies contiguous with the western boundary of the Camsi III property, together with land necessary for acceleration and deceleration lanes from the proposed collector street onto and off of Montague Expressway, the land consisting of two wedge shaped parcels, 600 feet in length and varying width, between 20 feet to 0 feet.

(2) A 20-foot wide easement for entry into state land, to fill an existing channel and install and maintain a water main, lying contiguous to the northern right-of-way line of Montague Expressway and running from the western boundary of Camsi III property, westerly to De La Cruz Boulevard, excepting that right-of-way previously described in paragraph (1) of this subdivision for the proposed street purpose.

(3) A 30-foot wide easement, for the purpose of filling an existing storm channel, running from Montague Expressway 441 feet northerly along the water boundary of Camsi III property.

(4) Other easements determined by the Director of General Services as necessary for the purpose of constructing a business development park pursuant to Section 14672.9 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 121, Sec. 2.   Effective June 3, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

4447.

Notwithstanding Section 4444, the Director of General Services with the consent of the State Department of Developmental Services, may grant a right-of-way for road purposes to the City of Stockton over and along a portion of the Stockton State Hospital property adjacent to Harding Way upon such terms and conditions and with such reservations and exceptions as in the opinion of the Director of General Services may be for the best interests of the state.

The Director of General Services under the same conditions may grant a right-of-way for road purposes to the County of Orange over a portion of the Fairview State Hospital property adjacent to Harbor Boulevard.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4108 by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4448.

The department shall participate with the City of Porterville in the construction of an interceptor sewer between the Porterville State Hospital facilities and the sewer facilities of the City of Porterville.

For the purpose of this section the state may expend from any available funds 20 percent of the bid for the construction of the project authorized pursuant to this section or sixty thousand dollars ($60,000), whichever is less.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4108.2 by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4449.

The State Department of Developmental Services has general control and direction of the property and concerns of each state hospital specified in Section 4440. The department shall:

(a) Take care of the interests of the hospital, and see that its purpose and its bylaws, rules, and regulations are carried into effect, according to law.

(b) Establish such bylaws, rules, and regulations as it deems necessary and expedient for regulating the duties of officers and employees of the hospital, and for its internal government, discipline, and management.

(c) Maintain an effective inspection of the hospital.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

4450.

The medical superintendent shall make triplicate estimates, in minute detail, as approved by the State Department of Developmental Services of such supplies, expenses, buildings, and improvements as are required for the best interests of the hospital, and for the improvement thereof and of the grounds and buildings connected therewith. These estimates shall be submitted to the State Department of Developmental Services which may revise them. The department shall certify that it has carefully examined the estimates, and that the supplies, expenses, buildings, and improvements contained in such estimates, as approved by it, are required for the best interests of the hospital. The department shall thereupon proceed to purchase such supplies, make such expenditures, or conduct such improvements or buildings in accordance with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4451.

The state hospitals may manufacture supplies, materials, and assisting devices which are for the benefit of individuals with disabilities who otherwise would not have access to those articles, or which are necessary or required to be used in any of the state hospitals, and which can be economically manufactured therein. The necessary cost and expense of providing for and conducting the manufacture of such supplies and materials shall be paid in the same manner as other expenses of the hospitals. No hospital shall enter into or engage in manufacturing any supplies or materials unless permission for the same is obtained from the State Department of Developmental Services. If, at any time, it appears to the department that the manufacture of any article is not being or cannot be economically carried on at a state hospital, the department may suspend or stop the manufacture of such article, and on receipt of a certified copy of the order directing the suspension or stopping of such manufacture, by the medical superintendent, the hospital shall cease from manufacturing such article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1071, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4452.

All money belonging to the state and received by state hospitals from any source, except appropriations, shall, at the end of each month, be deposited in the State Treasury, to the credit of the General Fund. This section shall not apply to the funds known as the industrial or amusement funds or the “sheltered workshop funds.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4453.

The state hospitals and the officers thereof shall make such financial statements to the Controller as the Controller requires.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4454.

The authorities for the several hospitals shall furnish to the State Department of Developmental Services the facts mentioned in Section 4425 and such other obtainable facts as the department from time to time requires of them, with the opinion of the superintendent thereon, if requested. The superintendent or other person in charge of a hospital shall, within 10 days after the admission of any person thereto, cause an abstract of the medical certificate and order on which such person was received and a list of all property, books, and papers of value found in the possession of or belonging to such person to be forwarded to the office of the department, and when a patient is discharged, transferred, or dies, the superintendent or person in charge shall within three days thereafter, send the information to the office of the department, in accordance with the form prescribed by it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4455.

The department may permit, subject to such conditions and regulations as it may impose, any religious or missionary corporation or society to erect a building on the grounds of any state hospital for the holding of religious services. Each such building when erected shall become the property of the state and shall be used exclusively for the benefit of the patients and employees of the state hospital.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4456.

The department may establish and supervise under its rules and regulations training schools or courses for employees of the department or of state institutions under its jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

4457.

Whenever a trial is had of any person charged with escape or attempt to escape from a state hospital, whenever a hearing is had on the return of a writ of habeas corpus prosecuted by or on behalf of any person confined in a state hospital except in a proceeding to which Section 5110 applies, whenever a hearing is had on a petition under Section 1026.2, subdivision (b) of Section 1026.5, or subdivision (f) of Section 2960 of the Penal Code, or Section 7361 of this code for the release of a person confined in a state hospital, and whenever a person confined in a state hospital is tried for any crime committed therein, the appropriate financial officer or other designated official of the county in which the trial or hearing is had shall make out a statement of all costs incurred by the county for investigation and other preparation for the trial or hearing, and the actual trial or hearing, all costs of maintaining custody of the patient and transporting him or her to and from the hospital, and costs of appeal, which statement shall be properly certified by a judge of the superior court of that county and sent to the Controller for approval. After the court approval, the Controller shall cause the amount of the costs incurred on and after July 1, 1987, to be paid out of the money appropriated by the Legislature, to the county treasurer of the county where the trial or hearing was had.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 206.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4459.

The State Department of Developmental Services shall investigate and examine all nonresident persons judicially committed to any state hospital and shall cause such persons, when found to be nonresidents as defined in this chapter, to be promptly and humanely returned under proper supervision to the state in which they have legal residence. The department may defer such action by reason of a patient’s medical condition.

For the purpose of facilitating the prompt and humane return of such persons the State Department of Developmental Services may enter into reciprocal agreements with the proper boards, commissions, or officers of other states or political subdivision thereof for the mutual exchange or return of such person judicially committed to any state hospital in one state whose legal residence is in the other, and it may in such reciprocal agreements vary the period of residence as defined in this chapter to meet the requirements or laws of the other states.

The department may give written permission for the return of any resident of this state confined in a public institution in another state, corresponding to any state home for the developmentally disabled of this state. When a resident is returned to this state pursuant to this chapter, he may be admitted as a voluntary patient to any institution of the department as designated by the Director of Developmental Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4460.

In order to be entitled to hospitalization in this state, an adult developmentally disabled person or the parent or guardian or conservator of a developmentally disabled minor shall be a state resident. Residence acquired in this or in another state shall not be lost by reason of military service in the armed forces of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

4461.

(a) All expenses incurred in returning such persons to other states shall be paid by this state, the person, or his or her relatives, but the expense of returning residents of this state shall be borne by the state making the returns.

(b) The cost and expense incurred in effecting the transportation of the nonresident persons to the states in which they have residence shall be advanced from the funds appropriated for that purpose or, if necessary, from the money appropriated for the care of developmentally disabled persons upon vouchers approved by the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 281.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4462.

The State Department of Developmental Services, when it deems it necessary, may, under conditions prescribed by the director, transfer any patients of a state institution under its jurisdiction to another such institution. Transfers of patients of state hospitals shall be made in accordance with the provisions of Section 7300.

Transfer of a conservatee shall only be with the consent of the conservator. 

The expense of any such transfer shall be paid from the moneys available by law for the support of the department or for the support of the institution from which the patient is transferred. Liability for the care, support, and maintenance of a patient so transferred in the institution to which he has been transferred shall be the same as if he had originally been committed to such institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4463.

The Director of Developmental Services may authorize the transfer of persons from any institution within the department to any institution authorized by the federal government to receive such person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4464.

The State Department of Developmental Services shall send to the Department of Veterans Affairs whenever requested a list of all persons who have been patients for six months or more in each state institution within the jurisdiction of the State Department of Developmental Services and who are known to have served in the armed forces of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4465.

The Director of Developmental Services may deposit any funds of patients in the possession of each hospital administrator of a state hospital in trust with the treasurer pursuant to Section 16305.3, Government Code, or, subject to the approval of the Department of Finance, may deposit such funds in interest-bearing bank accounts or invest and reinvest such funds in any of the securities which are described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 16430), Chapter 3, Part 2, Division 1, Title 2 of the Government Code and for the purposes of deposit or investment only may mingle the funds of any patient with the funds of other patients. The hospital administrator with the consent of the patient may deposit the interest or increment on the funds of a patient in the state hospital in a special fund for each state hospital, to be designated the “benefit fund,” of which he shall be the trustee. He may, with the approval of the Director of Developmental Services, expend the moneys in any such fund for the education or entertainment of the patients of the institution.

On and after December 1, 1970, the funds of a patient in a state hospital or a patient on leave of absence from a state hospital shall not be deposited in interest-bearing bank accounts or invested and reinvested pursuant to this section except when authorized by the patient; any interest or increment accruing on the funds of a patient on leave of absence from a state hospital shall be deposited in his account; any interest or increment accruing on the funds of a patient in a state hospital shall be deposited in his account, unless such patient authorizes their deposit in the state hospital’s “benefit fund.”

Any state hospital charges for patient care against the funds of a patient in the possession of a hospital administrator or deposited pursuant to this section and which are used to pay for such care, shall be stated in an itemized bill to the patient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4466.

Whenever any patient in any state institution subject to the jurisdiction of the State Department of Developmental Services dies, and any personal funds or property of such patient remains in the hands of the superintendent thereof, and no demand is made upon such superintendent by the owner of the funds or property or his legally appointed representative all money and other personal property of such decedent remaining in the custody or possession of the superintendent thereof shall be held by him for a period of one year from the date of death of the decedent, for the benefit of the heirs, legatees, or successors in interest of such decedent.

Upon the expiration of such one-year period, any money remaining unclaimed in the custody or possession of the superintendent shall be delivered by him to the State Treasurer for deposit in the Unclaimed Property Fund under the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 1440) of Chapter 6 of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

Upon the expiration of such one-year period, all personal property and documents of the decedent, other than cash, remaining unclaimed in the custody or possession of the superintendent, shall be disposed of as follows:

(a) All deeds, contracts or assignments shall be filed by the superintendent with the public administrator of the county of commitment of the decedent;

(b) All other personal property shall be sold by the superintendent at public auction, or upon a sealed-bid basis, and the proceeds of the sale delivered by him to the State Treasurer in the same manner as is herein provided with respect to unclaimed money of the decedent. If he deems it expedient to do so, the superintendent may accumulate the property of several decedents and sell the property in such lots as he may determine, provided that he makes a determination as to each decedent’s share of the proceeds;

(c) If any personal property of the decedent is not salable at public auction, or upon a sealed-bid basis, or if it has no intrinsic value, or if its value is not sufficient to justify the deposit of such property in the State Treasury, the superintendent may order it destroyed;

(d) All other unclaimed personal property of the decedent not disposed of as provided in subdivision (a), (b), or (c) hereof, shall be delivered by the superintendent to the State Controller for deposit in the State Treasury under the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 1440) of Chapter 6 of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4467.

Whenever any patient in any state institution subject to the jurisdiction of the State Department of Developmental Services escapes, or is discharged or is on leave of absence from such institution, and any personal funds or property of such patient remains in the hands of the superintendent thereof, and no demand is made upon said superintendent by the owner of the funds or property or his legally appointed representative, all money and other intangible personal property of such patient, other than deeds, contracts, or assignments, remaining in the custody or possession of the superintendent thereof shall be held by him for a period of seven years from the date of such escape, discharge, or leave of absence, for the benefit of such patient or his successors in interest; provided, however, that unclaimed personal funds or property of minors on leave of absence may be exempted from the provisions of this section during the period of their minority and for a period of one year thereafter, at the discretion of the Director of Developmental Services.

Upon the expiration of said seven-year period, any money and other intangible property, other than deeds, contracts, or assignments, remaining unclaimed in the custody or possession of the superintendent shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

Upon the expiration of one year from the date of such escape, discharge, or parole:

(a) All deeds, contracts or assignments shall be filed by the superintendent with the public administrator of the county of commitment of such patient;

(b) All tangible personal property other than money, remaining unclaimed in his custody or possession, shall be sold by the superintendent at public auction, or upon a sealed-bid basis, and the proceeds of the sale shall be held by him subject to the provisions of Section 4465 of this code, and subject to the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. If he deems it expedient to do so, the superintendent may accumulate the property of several patients and may sell the property in such lots as he may determine, provided that he makes a determination as to each patient’s share of the proceeds;